en: Panela cheeses
es: Quesos panelas
fr: Fromages panelas
hr: Panela sirevi

en: Cotija cheese, Cotija
de: Cotija-Käse, Cotija
es: Queso Cotija, Cotija
fr: Queso Cotija, Cotija
hr: Kotija sir
hu: Cotija
ja: コテハ・チーズ
jv: Cotija kèju, Cotija
ko: 코티하 치즈
ru: Котиха

en: Double cream cheeses
de: Käse Doppelrahmstufe, Doppelrahmstufenkäse
es: Quesos doble crema, Quesos cremosos doble crema, queso doble crema
fr: Fromages double crème
hr: Dupli krem ​​sirevi
nl: Volle roomkazen, Volle roomkaas

en: Smoked cheeses
bg: Пушено сирене и кашкавал
de: Räucherkäse, Geräucherter Käse
fr: Fromages fumés
hr: Dimljeni sirevi
hu: Füstölt sajtok
ja: スモークチーズ
lt: Rūkyti sūriai, Rūkytas sūris
nl: Gerookte kazen, Rookkaas
pl: Sery wędzone, Ser wędzony
pt: Queijos defumatos

en: Lactose-free cheeses
bg: Сирене и кашкавал без лактоза
es: Quesos sin lactosa
fi: Laktoosittomat juustot
fr: Fromages sans lactose
hr: Sirevi bez laktoze
it: Formaggi senza lattosio
lt: Sūriai be laktozės
nl: Lactose-vrije kazen, Lactose-vrije kaas, Kaas zonder lactose
pl: Sery bez laktozy

en: Sliced cheeses
ca: Formatges en talls
de: Scheibenkäse, Käseaufschnitt
es: Quesos en lonchas, Lonchas de queso, Quesos en fetas
fi: siivutetut juustot
fr: Fromages en tranches, tranches de fromage, tranches de fromages
hr: Narezani sirevi
hu: Szeletel sajtok
it: Formaggio a fette
ja: スライスチーズ
lt: Pjaustyti sūriai
nl: Kazen in plakjes
pl: Sery w plastrach
pt: Queijos em fatias
tr: Dilim peynir

en: Sliced mozzarellas, Sliced mozzarella
fr: Mozzarellas en tranches
hr: Narezane mozzarelle
nl: Mozzarella in plakjes

en: Paneer, panir
xx: Paneer, panir

en: Frozen Paneer, Frozen panir
fr: Paneer surgelé, panir surgelé

en: Soy-based Paneer, Soy-based Panir
fr: Paneer au soja, panir au soja

en: Cheeses for kids
bg: Сирене и кашкавал за деца
de: Käse für Kinder
fr: Fromages pour enfants, fromage enfant, fromages enfants
hr: Sirevi za djecu
hu: Sajtok gyerekeknek
lt: Sūriai vaikams

en: Brined cheeses
bg: Бяло саламурено сирене
fr: Fromages saumurés
hr: Salamureni sirevi
lt: Sūdyti sūriai
nl: Gepeklde kazen
ru: Рассольные сыры

en: Artisan cheeses
de: Handgefertigter Käse
es: Quesos artesanales, queso artesanal
fr: Fromages artisanaux, fromage artisanal
hr: Obrtnički sirevi
hu: Kézműves sajtok
lt: Amatininkų sūriai
nl: Ambachtelijke kazen

en: Blue-veined cheeses, blue cheeses
bg: Синьо сирене
de: Blauschimmelkäse, Blaukäse
es: Queso azul, Quesos de pasta azul
fi: sinihomejuustot
fr: Fromages à pâte persillée, pâtes à moisissure interne, bleus
hr: Sirevi s plavim žilicama
hu: Kék satjtok
it: Formaggio erborinato
ja: ブルーチーズ
lt: Mėlynojo pelėsio sūriai, Mėlynieji sūriai
nl: Blauwschimmelkazen

en: French blue-veined cheeses
de: Französischer Blauschimmelkäse
es: Queso azul francés
fi: ranskalaiset sinihomejuustot
fr: Fromages à pâte persillée français, pâtes à moisissure interne français, bleus français, Fromage bleu au lait de vache
hr: Francuski sirevi s plavim žilicama
it: Formaggio erborinato francese
nl: Franse blauwschimmelkazen

en: Auvergne blue cheese from cow's milk
de: Bleu d'Auvergne
fr: Bleus d'Auvergne, Bleu d'Auvergne
hr: Auvergne plavi sir od kravljeg mlijeka
nl: Bleus d'Auvergne

en: Jura blue cheese
de: Bleu du Haut Jura
fr: Bleu du Haut-Jura, bleus du Haut-Jura
hr: Jura plavi sir

en: Septmoncel blue cheese from cow's milk
fr: Bleu de Septmoncel, bleus de Septmoncel

en: Gex blue cheese
fr: Bleu de Gex

en: Fourme d'Ambert cheese from cow's milk
fr: Fourme d'Ambert